Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1096
Order for delivery; when returnable.

The return day for the order of delivery shall be twenty days after
its issuance unless a later
date is specified in the order of delivery, in which case the return date
shall be the date specified in the order of delivery.

R.S.1867, Code § 184, p. 422;

R.S.1913, § 7825;

C.S.1922, § 8769;

C.S.1929, § 20-1096;

R.S.1943, § 25-1096;

Laws 1973, LB 474, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB734, § 1.